Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.010

Intent.

The purpose of this chapter is to protect the public from adulteration, misbranding, and false advertisement of food in intrastate commerce. The intent is to promote uniformity with federal law, governmental transparency, and regulatory fairness.

[ 2018 c 236 s 1.]